Hawaii statutes.
§622-43 Decree of distribution, prima facie
evidence of what. When upon the trial of any cause in any court of the
State it becomes necessary to show the devolution of the title to land any
former owner of which died intestate, a decree or order of distribution duly
entered by a court having jurisdiction in probate of the estate of any such
deceased owner may be received in evidence, and, when so received, shall
constitute prima facie proof of the descent of the title to the person or
persons named as distributee or distributees in the order or decree, provided
that the order or decree was so entered not less than ten years prior to the
date upon which the cause was commenced. [L 1923, c 169, §1; RL 1925, §2609; RL
1935, §3849; RL 1945, §9900; RL 1955, §224-24; HRS §622-43]

Case Notes

Cited: 49 H. 273, 295, 296, 414 P.2d 925; 45 H. 521, 536,
371 P.2d 379.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next